Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3226.10
Flood protection and water quality
enhancement bonds; authorized; natural resources district; powers and duties;
special bond levy authorized.

In addition to other powers authorized by law, the board
of directors of a natural resources district encompassing a city of the metropolitan
class, upon an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board
of directors, may issue negotiable bonds and refunding bonds of the district,
entitled flood protection and water quality enhancement bonds, with terms
determined appropriate by the board of directors, payable from an annual special
flood protection and water quality enhancement bond levy upon the taxable
value of all taxable property in the district. Such special bond levy is includable
in the computation of other limitations upon the district's tax levy and shall
not exceed one cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation annually
on all of the taxable property within the district without approval by a majority
of registered voters of the district at an election in accordance with the
Election Act called by the board of directors and held in conjunction with
a statewide primary or general election.

Laws 2009, LB160, § 1.

Election Act, see section 32-101.